Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.145 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Family member" means:
1. A parent, brother, sister, son, daughter, aunt, uncle, cousin, or
grandparent related to the student by consanguinity, affinity, or
adoption; and
2. An adult that resides in the same household as the student;
(b) "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, a person acting as a parent in the
absence of a parent or guardian, or other individual[person] or agency
responsible for a student;
(c) "Private electronic communication" means electronic communication that
involves direct one-on-one or small group conversations that are only
accessible to the participants;
(d) "Qualified school volunteer" means an adult who is not a school district
employee and is not enrolled in the school district who serves the school or
school district as a student teacher, a nonfaculty coach or assistant coach, a
nonfaculty sponsor of an extracurricular program or activity, a school-
sponsored academic tutor, or any other individual who serves in a
nonfaculty student services role designated as a qualified school volunteer
by the local board of education. Upon obtaining status as a qualified school
volunteer, an adult shall retain his or her status for the duration of the
academic year;
(e) "School district employee:[ or volunteer"]
1. Means a school administrator, classified employee who is not enrolled
in the school district,[or] certified employee[ of a school district, school
Page 1 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
volunteer], or compensated nonfaculty coach or assistant coach; and
2. Includes any Kentucky Department of Education or educational
cooperative employee who is assigned to a school or area technology
center within the school district[, student teacher, or sponsor of an
extracurricular program or activity];
(f)[ (d)] "Traceable communication system" means one (1) or more electronic
school notification and communication programs or applications that:
1. Are designated by a local board of education in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section;
2. Trace all communications sent to or by a student; and
3. Provide parents an opportunity to access and review those
communications; and
(g)[(e)] "Unauthorized electronic communication":
1. Means private[an] electronic communication with a student enrolled in
a school district by the[a] school district's[district] employee or
qualified school volunteer who is not the student's family member that
occurs outside of a designated traceable communication system and
without prior written parental consent;[ and]
2. Includes any private electronic communication with a student or
students enrolled in the school district through a personal email
account, text messaging, social media, or other private electronic
[notification and ]communication program[programs] outside of the
traceable communication system[.]; and
3. Does not include:
a. Virtual school instruction;
b. Electronic translation services;
c. Electronic communication with any telephone number provided
Page 2 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
by a parent for the purpose of school communication with that
parent;
d. Electronic communication in which a parent of the student is
included as a recipient or participant;
e. Voice communication on an official telephone number affiliated
with the school or school district;
f. Social media posts and comments that are not private electronic
communication;
g. Electronic communication related to commercial products or
services with a telephone number, email address, or other
electronic account affiliated with a lawful commercial business;
h. Electronic communication with a telephone number, email
address, or other electronic account affiliated with a nonprofit
organization granted tax exemption by the Internal Revenue
Service under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
i. Secure messaging for healthcare providers.
(2) Each local board of education shall designate a traceable communication system[ to
be the exclusive means] for [a ]school district employees and qualified school
volunteers[employee or volunteer] to communicate electronically with students
enrolled in the school district. The principal of each public school shall provide
parents written or electronic notification within the first ten (10) days of the school
year of each electronic school notification and communication program designated
within the traceable communication system. The notification shall include
instructions for parents to access and review communications sent through each
electronic school notification and communication program.
(3) (a) [Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, ]A school
district employee or qualified school volunteer shall not engage in
Page 3 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
unauthorized electronic communication[communicate electronically with a
student:
1. Outside of the traceable communication system designated by the local
board of education; or
2. Through an unauthorized electronic communication program or
application].
(b) A school district employee that violates paragraph (a) of this subsection
may[shall] be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with:
1. For certified employees, KRS 161.120 and 161.790; or
2. For classified employees, KRS 161.011(7).
(c) A qualified school volunteer that violates paragraph (a) of this subsection
may[shall] be prohibited by the school district from future school volunteer
opportunities.
(4) A parent may submit written consent to authorize a designated school district
employee or qualified school volunteer who is not a family member to participate
in private electronic communication[communicate electronically] with his or her
child outside of the traceable communication system. The written consent:
(a) Shall be filed in the administrative office of the student's school;
(b) Shall be submitted to the administrative office prior to any private electronic
communication being sent from a school district employee or qualified school
volunteer to a student outside of the traceable communication system;
(c)[(b)] Shall designate each[a single,] specific school district employee or
qualified school volunteer[ per each consent form] that may participate in
private electronic communication[communicate] with the student outside of
the traceable communication system and shall not be transferable to any other
school district employee or qualified school volunteer;
(d)[(c)] May be revoked by the[a] parent who filed the consent at any time.
Page 4 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
Upon notice of a revocation, the administrative office shall promptly notify
the school district and each school district employee and qualified school
volunteer subject to the revocation;
(e)[(d)] May establish terms limiting electronic communication with a student,
including [a term requiring that a parent be included as a direct party to all
electronic communications sent to the student outside of the traceable
communication system or ]establishing an expiration for the term of the
consent. Any electronic communication with the[a] student enrolled in the
school district outside of the traceable communication system under this
subsection shall comply with all terms of the written consent;[ and]
(f) Shall not be rejected or denied by the school or school district unless the
written consent fails to properly identify the applicable student, school
district employee, or qualified school volunteer. Upon receipt of the written
consent, the administrative office of the school shall deliver a copy of the
written consent to the school district and the designated school district
employee or qualified school volunteer;
(g) Shall not be compelled as a requirement for a student to participate in an
academic, athletic, or extracurricular opportunity; and
(h)[(e)] Shall not authorize a school district employee or qualified school
volunteer to engage in inappropriate or sexual electronic communication with
a student or be used as a basis of a defense for a school district employee or
qualified school volunteer that engages in inappropriate or sexual electronic
communication with a student or students.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, this section shall not restrict
any private electronic communications:
(a) Between a student and his or her family member who is a school district
employee or qualified school volunteer; or
Page 5 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(b) Between a student and a school district employee or qualified school
volunteer who reasonably believes an emergency exists that creates an
imminent risk to any person or property, provided the school district
employee promptly discloses the private electronic communication to his or
her immediate supervisor after the fact in accordance with subsection (6) of
this section.
(6) (a) A school district employee or qualified school volunteer that participated in
unauthorized electronic communication or reasonably believes[receives a
report alleging] that another school district employee or qualified school
volunteer participated in unauthorized electronic communication that has not
been previously reported shall immediately notify the supervising principal or
applicable supervisor. If the subject of the report is the principal or district-
wide employee, the reporting employee or volunteer shall immediately notify
the superintendent of the school district. If the subject of the report is the
superintendent or a Kentucky Department of Education employee assigned
to a school or area technology center within the school district, the reporting
employee or volunteer shall immediately notify the commissioner of
education and the chair of the local board of education.
(b) A school district employee that violates paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with:
1. For certified employees, KRS 161.120 and 161.790; or
2. For classified employees, KRS 161.011(7).
(7) (a) Upon receipt of a report alleging that a school district employee or qualified
school volunteer participated in unauthorized electronic communication, the
commissioner of education, a principal, or a superintendent shall immediately:
1. Notify the parent of each student that is an alleged party to the
unauthorized electronic communications; and
Page 6 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
2. a. If the individual that is the subject of the report is a certified
employee:
i. Notify the Education Professional Standards Board, which
shall promptly investigate all allegations received under this
subsection and proceed with appropriate disciplinary actions
in accordance with KRS 161.120; and
ii. Investigate the underlying allegations and proceed with
appropriate disciplinary actions in accordance with KRS
161.790;
b. If the individual that is the subject of the report is a classified
employee, investigate the underlying allegations and proceed with
appropriate disciplinary actions in accordance with KRS
161.011(7); and
c. If the individual that is the subject of the report is a qualified
school[ or district] volunteer, the school or district shall investigate
the underlying allegations and, if substantiated, the qualified
school volunteer may[shall] be prohibited from future school and
district volunteer opportunities.
(b) A principal or superintendent who violates paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with KRS 156.132 and
161.120.
Section 2. KRS 158.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a school council or, if none exists, the principal adopts a curriculum for human
sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases, instruction shall include but not be
limited to the following content:
(a) Abstinence from sexual activity is the desirable goal for all school-age
children;
Page 7 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(b) Abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain way to avoid unintended
pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and other associated health
problems;
(c) The best way to avoid sexually transmitted diseases and other associated
health problems is to establish a permanent mutually faithful monogamous
relationship;
(d) A policy to respect parental rights by ensuring that:
1. [Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, ]Children in
grade five (5) and below do not receive any instruction through
curriculum or programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted
diseases; or
2. Any child, regardless of grade level, enrolled in the district does not
receive any instruction or presentation that has a goal or purpose of
students studying or exploring gender identity, gender expression, or
sexual orientation; and
(e) A policy to notify a parent in advance and obtain the parent's written consent
before the parent's child in grade six (6) or above receives any instruction
through curriculum or programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted
diseases authorized in this section.
(2) Any course, curriculum, or program offered by a public school on the subject of
human sexuality provided by school personnel or by third parties authorized by the
school shall:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, provide an alternative
course, curriculum, or program without any penalty to the student's grade or
standing for students whose parents have not provided written consent as
required in subsection (1)(e) of this section;
(b) Be subject to an inspection by parents of participating students that allows
Page 8 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
parents to review the following materials:
1. Curriculum;
2. Instructional materials;
3. Lesson plans;
4. Assessments or tests;
5. Surveys or questionnaires;
6. Assignments; and
7. Instructional activities;
(c) Be developmentally appropriate; and
(d) Be limited to a curriculum that has been subject to the reasonable review and
response by stakeholders in conformity with this subsection and KRS
160.345(2).
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a public school offering any
course, curriculum, or program on the subject of human sexuality shall provide
notification to the parents of a student at least two (2) weeks prior to the student's
planned participation in the course, curriculum, or program. The notification shall:
(a) Inform the parents of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Provide the date the course, curriculum, or program is scheduled to begin;
(c) Detail the process for a parent to review the materials outlined in subsection
(2) of this section;
(d) Explain the process for a parent to provide written consent for the student's
participation in the course, curriculum, or program; and
(e) Provide the contact information for the teacher or instructor of the course,
curriculum, or program and a school administrator designated with oversight.
(4) Each public school shall provide age-appropriate instruction on child sexual
abuse to all students regardless of grade level through curriculum or programs in
accordance with the standards set forth by the National Children's Alliance and
Page 9 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
approved by the Children's Advocacy Centers of Kentucky. This instruction shall
not be subject to the requirements of subsections (2)(a) and (3) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit school personnel from:
(a) Discussing human sexuality, including the sexuality of any historic person,
group, or public figure, where the discussion provides necessary context in
relation to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved pursuant to KRS
160.345; or
(b) [Providing age-appropriate instruction on child sexual abuse through
curriculum or programs in accordance with the standards set forth by the
National Children's Alliance and approved by the Children's Advocacy
Centers of Kentucky, regardless of grade level; or
(c) ]Responding to a question from a student during class regarding human
sexuality as it relates to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved
pursuant to KRS 160.345.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A public school district or public charter school shall not enter into a nondisclosure
agreement relating to misconduct involving a minor or student, including but not
limited to:
(1) Unauthorized electronic communication as defined in Section 1 of this Act; or
(2) Abusive conduct as defined in Section 4 of this Act.
Section 4. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Abusive conduct" means sexual misconduct and conduct subject to
mandatory reporting under KRS 620.030 that involves a minor or student;
(b) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Page 10 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(c)[(b)] "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet
the needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom
setting but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms,
centers, or campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance,
improve behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative
education programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(d)[(c)] "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child
abuse or neglect relating to a specific individual;
(e)[(d)] "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(f)[(e)] "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the
resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified
staff member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local
school district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-
employee bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position
openings created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract,
transfer, or death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for
which certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified
positions remain open after compliance with those procedures.
Page 11 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
Page 12 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
Page 13 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) (a) Each application for a school district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Disclose:
a Being the subject of any disciplinary action within the past
twelve (12) months; and
b. Any resulting resignation or termination related to abusive
conduct while employed by any school or school district; and
2. Consent to a reference check under paragraph (b) of this subsection
and a request for information under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(b) 1. A school district considering an applicant for employment shall
contact each school district, public school, or nonpublic school that
employs or previously employed the applicant for a reference check
before extending an offer of employment.
2. A school district, public school, or nonpublic school that employs or
previously employed the applicant shall disclose any disciplinary
action, and any resulting resignation or termination, related to abusive
Page 14 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
conduct while the applicant was employed by the school or school
district.
3. A school district, public school, or nonpublic school located in a
member state of the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact that employs
or previously employed the applicant shall disclose any disciplinary
action, and any resulting resignation or termination, related to abusive
conduct while the applicant was employed by the school or school
district.
4. Any school district, public school, nonpublic school, or any school
employees making a disclosure pursuant to this paragraph of any
disciplinary action and any resulting resignation or termination shall
be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be
incurred or imposed as a result of:
a. Making the disclosure; or
b. Participating in any judicial proceeding that may result from
making the disclosure.
(c) Upon disclosure under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection of
disciplinary action involving abusive conduct by an applicant, the school
district considering the applicant for employment shall:
1. Request all related information and records from the school district,
public school, or nonpublic school that previously employed or
currently employs the applicant; and
2. If the application is for a certified position, request information from
the Education Professional Standards Board related to pending
disciplinary action against the applicant involving abusive conduct.
(d) Upon request from a school district under paragraph (c) of this subsection,
the school district, public school, or nonpublic school of previous or current
Page 15 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
employment or the Educational Professional Standards Board shall provide
the requested information, if applicable, within ten (10) working days.
(e) Any failure to disclose under paragraph (a)1. of this subsection by an
applicant shall result in the applicant being:
1. Ineligible for hire by the school district; and
2. Subject to dismissal or termination if the applicant is hired by the
school district or is a current employee of the school district.
(f) The Education Professional Standards Board shall create and implement
procedures for responding to a school district upon receiving an inquiry
described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(7) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
Page 16 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and clear CA/N check[letter] required by paragraph (a) of
this subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
Page 17 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(8)[(7)] (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
Page 18 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(9)[(8)] The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a
certified employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex
crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N
check showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(10)[(9)] (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
Page 19 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency;[ and]
2. Provide picture identification; and
3. List each school district and nonpublic school in which the applicant
has been employed, including the dates of employment.
(11) (a) When an allegation of abusive conduct is made against a school district
employee, the school district employee in receipt of the allegation, whether
communicated in writing, electronically, or orally, shall report the
allegation to the school principal in accordance with KRS 620.030. The
principal shall document the allegation in writing and notify the
superintendent or designee. An investigation of the allegation shall be
conducted by the school district until it is completed and shall not end prior
to completion due to the employee transferring positions within the school
district or leaving the school district, unless directed by the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services or law enforcement officials to cease the
investigation.
(b) Notwithstanding Section 8 of this Act, all records and references relating to
Page 20 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
an allegation of abusive conduct by a school district employee with a
student or minor shall be included and remain in an employee's personnel
file until completion of an investigation. If, after completion of an
investigation, the allegation is determined to be false or unsubstantiated, all
records and references relating to the allegation shall be removed from the
employee's personnel file.
(12)[(10)] Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the
contrary, any certified or classified employee of the school district shall notify the
superintendent within seven (7) calendar days of being[ when an employee of the
school district is] charged with any offense which is classified as a felony.[,] The
superintendent may transfer the employee to a second position until such time as
the employee is found not guilty, the charges are dismissed, the employee is
terminated, or the superintendent determines that further personnel action is not
required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same rate of pay he or she
received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with an offense outside of
the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the charge would have
been treated as a felony if committed within the Commonwealth. Transfers shall be
made to prevent disruption of the educational process and district operations and in
the interest of students and staff and shall not be construed as evidence of
misconduct.
(13)[(11)] Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified
employee of the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has
been found by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or
neglected a child, and if he or she has waived the right to appeal a
substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect or if the substantiated incident
was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to report this finding shall result in the
certified or classified employee being subject to dismissal or termination.
Page 21 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(14) The superintendent shall annually notify school district employees of the self-
reporting requirements of subsections (12) and (13) of this section.
(15)[(12)] The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services website.
(16) Subsections (1) and (5) to (14) of this section shall apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
Section 5. KRS 156.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With the advice of the Local Superintendents Advisory Council, the Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing
standards which school districts shall meet in student, program, service, and
operational performance. These regulations shall comply with the expected
outcomes for students and schools set forth in KRS 158.6451. Administrative
regulations shall be promulgated for the following:
(a) Courses of study for the different grades and kinds of common schools
identifying the common curriculum content directly tied to the goals,
outcomes, and assessment strategies developed under KRS 158.645,
158.6451, and 158.6453 and distributed to local school districts and schools.
The administrative regulations shall provide that:
1. If a school offers American sign language, the course shall be accepted
as meeting the foreign language requirements in common schools
notwithstanding other provisions of law;
2. If a school offers the Reserve Officers Training Corps program, the
course shall be accepted as meeting the physical education requirement
for high school graduation notwithstanding other provisions of law;
3. Every public middle and high school's curriculum shall include
instruction on the Holocaust and other cases of genocide, as defined by
the United Nations Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the
Page 22 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
Crime of Genocide, that a court of competent jurisdiction, whether a
court in the United States or the International Court of Justice, has
determined to have been committed by applying rigorous standards of
due process; and
4. Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, cursive writing shall be
included as a course of study in all elementary schools and shall be
designed to ensure proficiency in cursive writing by the end of grade
five (5);
(b) Courses of study or educational experiences available to students in all middle
and high schools to fulfill the prerequisites for courses in advanced science
and mathematics as defined in KRS 158.845;
(c) The acquisition and use of educational equipment for the schools as
recommended by the Council for Education Technology;
(d) The minimum requirements for high school graduation in light of the
expected outcomes for students and schools set forth in KRS 158.6451. The
minimum requirements shall not include achieving any postsecondary
readiness indicator as described in KRS 158.6455 or any minimum score on a
statewide assessment administered under KRS 158.6453. Student scores from
any assessment administered under KRS 158.6453 that are determined by the
department's technical advisory committee to be valid and reliable at the
individual level shall be included on the student transcript. The department's
technical advisory committee shall submit its determination to the
commissioner of education and the Legislative Research Commission;
(e) The requirements for an alternative high school diploma for students with
disabilities whose individualized education program indicates that, in
accordance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(d)(1)(A):
1. The student cannot participate in the regular statewide assessment; and
Page 23 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
2. An appropriate alternate assessment has been selected for the student
based upon a modified curriculum and an individualized course of
study;
(f) Taking and keeping a school census, and the forms, blanks, and software to be
used in taking and keeping the census and in compiling the required reports.
The board shall create a statewide student identification numbering system
based on students' Social Security numbers. The system shall provide a
student identification number similar to, but distinct from, the Social Security
number, for each student who does not have a Social Security number or
whose parents or guardians choose not to disclose the Social Security number
for the student;
(g) Sanitary and protective construction of public school buildings, toilets,
physical equipment of school grounds, school buildings, and classrooms. With
respect to physical standards of sanitary and protective construction for school
buildings, the Kentucky Board of Education shall adopt the Uniform State
Building Code;
(h) Medical inspection, physical and health education and recreation, and other
regulations necessary or advisable for the protection of the physical welfare
and safety of the public school children. The administrative regulations shall
set requirements for student health standards to be met by all students in
grades four (4), eight (8), and twelve (12) pursuant to the outcomes described
in KRS 158.6451. The administrative regulations shall permit a student who
received a physical examination no more than six (6) months prior to his or
her initial admission to Head Start to substitute that physical examination for
the physical examination required by the Kentucky Board of Education of all
students upon initial admission to the public schools, if the physical
examination given in the Head Start program meets all the requirements of the
Page 24 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
physical examinations prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education;
(i) A vision examination by an optometrist or ophthalmologist that shall be
required by the Kentucky Board of Education. The administrative regulations
shall require evidence that a vision examination that meets the criteria
prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education has been performed. This
evidence shall be submitted to the school no later than January 1 of the first
year that a three (3), four (4), five (5), or six (6) year-old child is enrolled in a
public school, public preschool, or Head Start program;
(j) 1. [Beginning with the 2010-2011 school year, ]A dental screening or
examination by a dentist, dental hygienist, physician, registered nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant that shall be
required by the Kentucky Board of Education. The administrative
regulations shall require evidence that a dental screening or examination
that meets the criteria prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education
has been performed. This evidence shall be submitted to the school no
later than January 1 of the first year that a five (5) or six (6) year-old
child is enrolled in a public school.
2. A child shall be referred to a licensed dentist if a dental screening or
examination performed by anyone other than a licensed dentist identifies
the possibility of dental disease;
(k) The transportation of children to and from school;
(l) The fixing of holidays on which schools may be closed and special days to be
observed, and the pay of teachers during absence because of sickness or
quarantine or when the schools are closed because of quarantine;
(m) The preparation of budgets and salary schedules for the several school
districts under the management and control of the Kentucky Board of
Education;
Page 25 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(n) A uniform series of forms and blanks, educational and financial, including
forms of contracts, for use in the several school districts;
(o) The disposal of real and personal property owned by local boards of
education; and
(p) The development and implementation of procedures, for all students who are
homeless children and youths as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 11434a(2), to do
the following:
1. Awarding and accepting of credit, including partial credit, for all
coursework satisfactorily completed by a student while enrolled at
another school;
2. Allowing a student who was previously enrolled in a course required for
graduation the opportunity, to the extent practicable, to complete the
course, at no cost to the student, before the beginning of the next school
year;
3. Awarding a diploma, at the student's request, by a district from which
the student transferred, if the student transfers schools at any time after
the completion of the student's second year of high school and the
student is ineligible to graduate from the district to which the student
transfers, but meets the graduation requirements of the district from
which the student transferred; and
4. Exempting the student from all coursework and other requirements
imposed by the local board of education that are in addition to the
minimum requirements for high school graduation established by the
Kentucky Board of Education pursuant to paragraph (d) of this
subsection in the district to which the student transfers, if the student
transfers schools at any time after the completion of the student's second
year of high school and the student is ineligible to graduate both from
Page 26 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
the district to which the student transfers and the district from which the
student transferred.
(2) Any private, parochial, or church school may voluntarily comply with:
(a) Curriculum, certification, and textbook standards established by the Kentucky
Board of Education; and
(b) Employment standards established in Section 4 of this Act;
and be certified upon application to the board by such schools.
(3) Any public school that violates the provisions of KRS 158.854 shall be subject to a
penalty to be assessed by the commissioner of education as follows:
(a) The first violation shall result in a fine of no less than one (1) week's revenue
from the sale of the competitive food;
(b) Subsequent violations shall result in a fine of no less than one (1) month's
revenue from the sale of the competitive food;
(c) "Habitual violations," which means five (5) or more violations within a six (6)
month period, shall result in a six (6) month ban on competitive food sales for
the violating school; and
(d) Revenue collected as a result of the fines in this subsection shall be
transferred to the food service fund of the local school district.
Section 6. KRS 160.151 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "certified nonpublic school" means a private,
parochial, or church school that has voluntarily been certified by the Kentucky
Board of Education in accordance with subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act.
(2)[(1)] (a) 1. A certified nonpublic school shall[private, parochial, or church
school that has voluntarily been certified by the Kentucky Board of
Education in accordance with KRS 156.160(2) may] require a national
and state criminal background check and require a clear CA/N check, as
defined in KRS 160.380, on all new certified hires in the school and
Page 27 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
student teachers assigned to the school and may require a new national
and state criminal background check and require a clear CA/N check on
each certified teacher once every five (5) years of employment.
2. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified position in
a Kentucky school within six (6) months of the date of the hire and who
had previously submitted to a national and state criminal background
check and were required to have a clear CA/N check for previous
employment may be excluded from the initial national or state criminal
background checks.
(b) The national criminal history background check shall be conducted by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation. The state criminal history background check
shall be conducted by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation by
the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal background
check has been conducted. Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky
State Police, the Administrative Office of the Courts, or the Federal Bureau of
Investigation shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing
the request and conducting the search.
(3)[(2)] (a) When a certified nonpublic[If a] school requires a criminal background
check or requires a clear CA/N check under this section[for a new hire], the
school shall conspicuously include the following disclosure statement on each
application or renewal form provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified position: "STATE LAW AUTHORIZES THIS SCHOOL TO
REQUIRE A CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
Page 28 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF[IS CLEAR TO HIRE
BASED ON NO FINDINGS OF SUBSTANTIATED] CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES[AS A CONDITION OF
EMPLOYMENT FOR THIS TYPE OF POSITION]."
(b) The school or school board may require an adult who is permitted access to
school grounds on a regularly scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a
written agreement for the purpose of providing services directly to a student
or students as part of a school-sponsored program or activity, a volunteer, or a
visitor to submit to a national criminal history check by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and state criminal history background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police or Administrative Office of the Courts and require a
clear CA/N check.
(c) Any request for records from the Department of Kentucky State Police under
this section shall be on an applicant fingerprint card provided by the
Department of Kentucky State Police if required. The results of the state
criminal background check and the results of the national criminal history
background check[, if requested,] shall be sent to the hiring superintendent.
When[If] a background check of child abuse and neglect records is requested,
the person seeking employment shall provide to the hiring superintendent a
clear CA/N check.
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
Page 29 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(e) Every five (5) years from the year an individual was required to submit to a
national and state criminal records check under subsection (2) of this
section, a certified nonpublic school shall require the individual to submit to
a state records check.
(4)[(3)] (a) A certified nonpublic school shall[voluntarily implementing the
provisions of this chapter may choose] not[ to] employ any person who is a
violent offender as defined by KRS 17.165(2), has been convicted of a sex
crime which is classified as a felony as defined by KRS 17.165(1), or has
committed a violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165(3) or persons with a
substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services. A certified nonpublic school may
employ, at its discretion, persons convicted of sex crimes classified as a
misdemeanor.
(b) If a school term has begun and a certified position remains unfilled or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a certified nonpublic school
[implementing this chapter] may employ an individual who will have
supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors on probationary status
pending receipt of a criminal history background check or the receipt of a
clear CA/N check, provided by the individual.
(c) Employment, including probationary employment, at a certified nonpublic
school shall[implementing this chapter may] be contingent on the receipt of a
criminal history background check documenting that the employee has no[a]
record as a violent offender, of a sex crime, or of a violent crime as defined in
KRS 17.165 and[or] the receipt of a clear CA/N check, provided by the
individual.[
(d) Nonpublic schools implementing this chapter may terminate probationary
employment under this section upon receipt of a criminal history background
Page 30 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
check documenting a record as a violent offender, of a sex crime, or of a
violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165 or the receipt of a clear CA/N check.]
(5)[(4)] The form for requesting a [clear ]CA/N check shall be made available on the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services website.
(6) A certified nonpublic school considering an applicant for employment shall
contact each nonpublic school or school district that currently employs or
previously employed the applicant for a reference check in accordance with
standards established by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) A certified nonpublic school shall not enter into a nondisclosure agreement
relating to misconduct involving a minor or student, including abusive conduct as
defined in Section 4 of this Act.
Section 7. KRS 156.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish, direct, and maintain a
statewide program of professional development to improve instruction in the
public schools.
(b) By August 1, 2025, the department shall create a four (4) year recurring
professional development training schedule that includes all professional
development for certified personnel required by subsection (2) of this section
and federal law.
(c) Each local school district shall implement the professional development
training schedule created by the department.
(2) All certified school district employees and public charter school employees shall
complete at least one (1) hour of each of the following trainings within twelve (12)
months of initial hire and at least once every four (4) years thereafter:
(a) How to respond to an active shooter situation training prepared by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training in collaboration with the department,
the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and the Center for School Safety;
Page 31 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(b) Child abuse and neglect prevention, recognition, and reporting training from
the list of trainings approved by the department in accordance with subsection
(7) of this section;
(c) 1. High-quality, evidence-based suicide prevention training, including risk
factors, warning signs, protective factors, response procedures, referral,
postvention, and the recognition of signs and symptoms of possible
mental illness.
2. As used in this paragraph, "postvention" means a series of planned
supports and interventions with persons affected by a suicide for the
purpose of facilitating the grieving or adjustment process, stabilizing the
environment, reducing the risk of negative behaviors, and limiting the
risk of further suicides through contagion; and
(d) Self-study review of seizure disorder materials.
(3) (a) Each local school district superintendent shall appoint a certified school
employee to fulfill the role and responsibilities of a professional development
coordinator who shall disseminate professional development information to
schools and personnel. Upon request by a school council or any employees of
the district, the coordinator shall provide technical assistance to the council or
the personnel that may include assisting with needs assessments, analyzing
school data, planning and evaluation assistance, organizing districtwide
programs requested by school councils or groups of teachers, or other
coordination activities.
(b) The manner of appointment, qualifications, and other duties of the
professional development coordinator shall be established by the local board
of education.
(c) The local district professional development coordinator may participate in the
Kentucky Department of Education annual training program for local school
Page 32 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
district professional development coordinators. The training program may
include but is not[ be] limited to the demonstration of various approaches to
needs assessment and planning; strategies for implementing long-term,
school-based professional development; strategies for strengthening teachers'
roles in the planning, development, and evaluation of professional
development; and demonstrations of model professional development
programs. The training shall include information about teacher learning
opportunities relating to the core content standards. The department shall
regularly collect and distribute this information.
(4) The department shall provide or facilitate optional, professional development
programs for certified personnel throughout the Commonwealth that are based on
the statewide needs of teachers, administrators, and other education personnel.
Programs may include classified staff and parents when appropriate. Programs
offered or facilitated by the department shall be at locations and times convenient to
local school personnel and shall be made accessible through the use of technology
when appropriate. They shall include programs that: address the goals for Kentucky
schools as stated in KRS 158.6451, including reducing the achievement gaps as
determined by an equity analysis of the disaggregated student performance data
from the state assessment program developed under KRS 158.6453; engage
educators in effective learning processes and foster collegiality and collaboration;
and provide support for staff to incorporate newly acquired skills into their work
through practicing the skills, gathering information about the results, and reflecting
on their efforts. Professional development programs shall be made available to
teachers based on their needs which shall include but not be limited to the following
areas:
(a) Strategies to reduce the achievement gaps among various groups of students
and to provide continuous progress;
Page 33 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(b) Curriculum content and methods of instruction for each content area,
including differentiated instruction;
(c) School-based decision making;
(d) Assessment literacy;
(e) Integration of performance-based student assessment into daily classroom
instruction;
(f) Nongraded primary programs;
(g) Research-based instructional practices;
(h) Instructional uses of technology;
(i) Curriculum design to serve the needs of students with diverse learning styles
and skills and of students of diverse cultures;
(j) Instruction in reading, including phonics, phonemic awareness,
comprehension, fluency, and vocabulary;
(k) Educational leadership; and
(l) Strategies to incorporate character education throughout the curriculum.
(5) The department shall assist school personnel in assessing the impact of professional
development on their instructional practices and student learning.
(6) (a) Upon the request of a school district or school council, the department shall
assist with the development of long-term school and district improvement
plans that include multiple strategies for professional development based on
the assessment of needs at the school level.
(b) Professional development strategies may include but are not limited to
participation in subject matter academies, teacher networks, training institutes,
workshops, seminars, and study groups; collegial planning; action research;
mentoring programs; appropriate university courses; and other forms of
professional development.
(c) In planning the use of the four (4) days for professional development under
Page 34 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
KRS 158.070, school councils and districts shall give priority to programs that
increase teachers' understanding of curriculum content and methods of
instruction appropriate for each content area based on individual school plans.
The district may use up to one (1) day to provide district-wide training and
training that is mandated by state or federal law. Only those employees
identified in the mandate or affected by the mandate shall be required to
attend the training.
(d) State funds allocated for professional development shall be used to support
professional development initiatives that are consistent with local school
improvement and professional development plans and teachers' individual
growth plans. The funds may be used throughout the year for all staff,
including classified and certified staff and parents on school councils or
committees. A portion of the funds allocated to each school council under
KRS 160.345 may be used to prepare or enhance the teachers' knowledge and
teaching practices related to the content and subject matter that are required
for their specific classroom assignments.
(7) (a) The department shall develop and maintain a list of approved comprehensive
evidence-informed trainings on child abuse and neglect prevention,
recognition, and reporting that encompass child physical, sexual, and
emotional abuse and neglect.
(b) The trainings shall be web-based or in-person and cover, at a minimum, the
following topics:
1. Recognizing child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect;
2. Reporting suspected child abuse and neglect in Kentucky as required by
KRS 620.030 and the appropriate documentation;
3. Responding to the child; and
4. Understanding the response of child protective services.
Page 35 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(c) The trainings shall include a questionnaire or other basic assessment tool upon
completion to document basic knowledge of training components.
(d) Each local board of education shall adopt one (1) or more trainings from the
list approved by the department to be implemented by schools.
(8) The department shall establish an electronic consumer bulletin board that posts
information regarding professional development providers and programs as a
service to school district central office personnel, school councils, teachers, and
administrators. Participation on the electronic consumer bulletin board shall be
voluntary for professional development providers or vendors, but shall include all
programs sponsored by the department. Participants shall provide the following
information: program title; name of provider or vendor; qualifications of the
presenters or instructors; objectives of the program; program length; services
provided, including follow-up support; costs for participation and costs of
materials; names of previous users of the program, addresses, and telephone
numbers; and arrangements required. Posting information on the bulletin board by
the department shall not be viewed as an endorsement of the quality of any specific
provider or program.
(9) (a) By May 1, 2027, the Kentucky Department of Education, in collaboration
with the Education Professional Standards Board, shall develop a training
for school district employees, to be provided via video recording, related to
appropriate relationships and communication with students, inappropriate
relationships and communication with students, sexual grooming, and
sexual misconduct.
(b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, and every five (5) years
thereafter, every local school district shall require all employees to undergo
the training described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) When an employee is hired by a district during a school year in which the
Page 36 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
training is not required, the school district shall require the employee to
complete the training within ninety (90) days of hiring.
(d) The requirements of this subsection shall apply to public charter schools as
a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(10) The department shall provide voluntary training to address the characteristics and
instructional needs of students at risk of school failure and most likely to drop out
of school. The training shall be developed to meet the specific needs of all certified
and classified personnel depending on their relationship with these students. The
training for instructional personnel shall be designed to provide and enhance skills
of personnel to:
(a) Identify at-risk students early in elementary schools as well as at-risk and
potential dropouts in the middle and high schools;
(b) Plan specific instructional strategies to teach at-risk students;
(c) Improve the academic achievement of students at risk of school failure by
providing individualized and extra instructional support to increase
expectations for targeted students;
(d) Involve parents as partners in ways to help their children and to improve their
children's academic progress; and
(e) Significantly reduce the dropout rate of all students.
(11)[(10)] The department shall establish teacher academies to the extent funding is
available in cooperation with postsecondary education institutions for elementary,
middle school, and high school faculty in core disciplines, utilizing facilities and
faculty from universities and colleges, local school districts, and other appropriate
agencies throughout the state. Priority for participation shall be given to those
teachers who are teaching core discipline courses for which they do not have a
major or minor or the equivalent. Participation of teachers shall be voluntary.
(12)[(11) The department shall annually provide to the oversight council established in
Page 37 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
KRS 15A.063, the information received from local schools pursuant to KRS
158.449.
Section 8. KRS 161.151 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in Section 4 of this Act, all records and references relating to an
allegation of a criminal offense committed by a school employee that did not lead to
formal charges and all records relating to a criminal proceeding in which a school
employee was found not guilty or the charges were dismissed shall be removed
from the school employee's personnel file by the superintendent or the
superintendent's designee in the local school district.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not preclude a school district
from separately investigating, taking action upon, and creating and maintaining
records on the same or a similar fact situation upon which the allegations of a
criminal offense was based.
Section 9. KRS 158.4431 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, a "Kentucky guardian" or "guardian" means an employee of
a local board of education who is employed for the purpose of providing school
safety and security to students and staff on a school site. A person providing
services as a guardian may only include honorably discharged veterans, retired
Kentucky state troopers, retired special and sworn law enforcement officers, and
former federal law enforcement officers. A guardian certified by the Center for
School Safety as having met all requirements of this section is deemed to be an
authorized individual under KRS 527.070(3)(f) and may be armed with a firearm on
school property.
(2) Local boards of education may employ as many guardians as the board considers
necessary for the safety and security of its schools.
(3) Prior to hiring a guardian, the local board of education shall require the applicant to
provide certification from the Center for School Safety that he or she meets all of
Page 38 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
the following minimum requirements:
(a) Is a citizen of the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Has received a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(c) Is currently licensed under KRS 237.110 to carry a concealed weapon;
(d) Has completed and passed background checks as required pursuant to
subsection (7)(a) of Section 4 of this Act[KRS 160.380(6)(a)], and has not
been convicted of any felony, any misdemeanor under KRS 510.120, 510.130,
510.140, or 510.148, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or
solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual
misconduct under KRS Chapter 510, or have had any offense listed in this
paragraph expunged;
(e) Has passed a medical examination completed by a licensed physician,
physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse to determine if he or
she can perform the duties of a guardian;
(f) Has passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Council. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug
screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of an illegal
controlled substance or prescription drug abuse;
(g) Has passed the following examinations administered by the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council:
1. A background investigation to determine the person's suitability for the
position of guardian;
2. A psychological suitability screening to determine the person's
suitability to perform guardian duties; and
3. A polygraph examination to determine the person's suitability to
perform guardian duties;
(h) Has passed the following courses provided by the Department of Criminal
Page 39 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
Justice Training:
1. Active Shooter Response;
2. Enhanced Handgun Performance; and
3. Patrol Rifle;
(i) Has passed the marksmanship qualification requirement for a retired peace
officer as specified in KRS 237.140;
(j) Has been honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States
within the five (5) years immediately preceding an initial contract to be a
guardian as evidenced by a Department of Defense form DD 214, or is a
retired Kentucky state trooper, retired special or sworn law enforcement
officer, or former federal law enforcement officer. Each agency that employed
a retired Kentucky state trooper, retired special law enforcement officer, or
sworn law enforcement officer shall provide to the retired individual proof of
prior employment in a prompt and efficient manner, without charge to the
individual; and
(k) Has met any other requirements imposed by the local board of education,
which may include but are not limited to a preemployment written
examination.
(4) Each guardian shall be required to complete annual firearm proficiency testing and
shall meet the standard in the same manner as set forth in KRS 237.140(4)(a) to (c).
(5) Each guardian shall be required to complete the course requirements for School
Resource Officer Training I (SRO I) as set forth in KRS 158.4414(8).
(6) The employing local board of education may require the completion of any
additional courses and training as determined to be necessary by the board.
(7) Any cost associated with subsections (3) to (6) of this section shall be the
responsibility of the guardian unless otherwise agreed to by the employing local
board of education. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall not charge more
Page 40 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
to guardians for tests, assessments, or training completed than what is customarily
charged to any other type of applicant tested, assessed, or trained by the council.
(8) A local board of education employing a guardian shall collaborate with the local
police department, local sheriff, area post of the Department of Kentucky State
Police, and the state school security marshal in order to adopt school district policy
regarding:
(a) The job description of the guardian, including but not limited to the scope of
duties, responsibilities, and direct supervisor of the guardian;
(b) The uniform to be worn by guardians that would best suit the needs of the
schools while also allowing outside agencies to easily identify guardians;
(c) The procedures, processes, and chain of command to be used during an
emergency in which law enforcement agencies are called to the school; and
(d) The type of firearm and ammunition to be used by the guardian, if any.
(9) A local board of education shall be immune from civil or criminal liability in all
claims arising out of any action of a guardian.
(10) Guardians shall possess all the immunities and defenses now available or hereafter
made available under state law to sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers,
and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in
the course of their employment.
(11) Nothing in this section requires a local board of education to hire or provide
guardians. Participation by a local board of education in the use of a guardian is
voluntary and subject to the availability of local school district funds. Any local
board of education that opts to participate shall do so at its own expense.
Section 10. KRS 156.492 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education may enter into an agreement with any
building and construction trade organization to develop a training program for
school counselors providing services to students in the Commonwealth. The
Page 41 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
purpose of the training program shall be to promote building and construction
trades and training facilities available to students by making school counselors
aware of what is available to students participating in the building and construction
trade. The training program shall include information relating to:
(a) The pay and benefits available to people who work in the building and
construction trades; and
(b) Job opportunities, pre-apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and pathways within
the building and construction trade industry.
(2) The participating trade organization shall ensure ample opportunities for school
counselors that serve grades seven (7) through twelve (12) to complete the training
created under subsection (1) of this section annually and shall bear all costs
associated with the training. The participating trade organization may choose to
offer professional development opportunities to teachers who serve students in
grades seven (7) through twelve (12), if resources are available for this purpose.
(3) The department shall include the training program created in this section on the
electronic consumer bulletin board created pursuant to KRS 156.095[(8)] if
requested by the training program.
(4) A school counselor serving students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) may
complete four (4) hours of training developed under this section which shall count
towards the twenty-one (21) hours required annually pursuant to KRS
156.101(4)(b)2.
(5) Local boards of education or school-based decision making councils may
incorporate this training as part of the four (4) days of professional development
required pursuant to KRS 158.070(3)(a) for teachers who serve students in grades
seven (7) through twelve (12) if offered by the participating trade organization.
Section 11. KRS 158.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The boards of education of local school districts may provide an opportunity for
Page 42 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
pupils to attend moral instruction in their jurisdiction, in the manner provided in this
section.
(2) (a) Local boards of education shall allow pupils to be excused for up to one (1)
hour on no more than one (1) day each week, which shall include time
attributed to travel to and from, to attend a district-approved request for a
moral instruction offering upon receiving the consent of the pupil's parent or
guardian.
(b) Moral instruction provided under this section shall not take place on school
property.
(c) Pupil participation in moral instruction shall be voluntary and free from
coercion by school personnel.
(d) Moral instruction shall be given without expense to any local board of
education above de minimis administrative expenses incurred in carrying out
this section.
(3) An individual, organization, entity, or any combination thereof seeking to provide a
moral instruction offering for pupils shall submit a written, signed request to the
local board of education of a school district regarding the proposed moral
instruction offering. The request shall include:
(a) Contact information for the primary individual who will be providing the
moral instruction, as well as all other individuals who may be transporting
pupils or providing moral instruction to students through the offering;
(b) A statement acknowledging and agreeing to be bound by the requirements
placed upon moral instruction offerings under this section;
(c) The address or a description of the location where the moral instruction will
be provided;
(d) A transportation plan to ensure the safety of pupils while traveling to and
from moral instruction within the allotted time period;
Page 43 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
(e) A statement acknowledging and agreeing to inform the parent or guardian of a
participating pupil that the school district and its employees and agents shall
not incur any liability as a result of any injury sustained by the pupil related to
participation in the moral instruction offering;
(f) A statement acknowledging and agreeing to indemnify and hold harmless the
school district and its employees and agents against any claims relating to the
moral instruction offering or transportation to or from the offering; and
(g) Proof of insurance coverage to be carried by the provider that shall include
adequate insurance for liability, property loss, and personal injury of students
related to the moral instruction offering or transportation to or from the
offering.
(4) (a) Upon receipt of a request under subsection (3) of this section, the local board
of education may make arrangements with the person seeking to provide the
moral instruction offering as the local board deems necessary.
(b) Upon approval by the local board of a request under this section, the
superintendent of the school district shall require each individual identified in
the request to submit to a national and state criminal history background
check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and have a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual,
consistent with the provisions of KRS 160.380(7)[(6)]. The individuals, or the
organization or entity through which the moral instruction offering will be
provided, shall be responsible for all costs associated with obtaining the
criminal history and CA/N checks under this paragraph.
(c) As a condition of the agreement between the local board and a provider, the
local board shall require that any individual identified in the request under
subsection (3) of this section be barred from providing transportation or
participating in moral instruction offerings under this section upon receipt by
Page 44 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
the school district of a report documenting a record of:
1. Child abuse or neglect;
2. A sex crime or criminal offense against a victim who is a minor, as
defined in KRS 17.500; or
3. A violent crime as defined in KRS 17.165;
by the individual. The prohibition shall continue until the local board receives
an updated record for that individual that does not contain a disqualifying
item.
(5) A pupil who attends a moral instruction offering at the time specified and for the
period fixed shall be:
(a) Credited with the time of attendance as if he or she had been in actual
attendance in school, and the time shall be included as part of the actual
school work required in KRS 158.060. A pupil shall not be penalized for any
school work missed during the specified time; and
(b) Included in calculating the average daily attendance for the Support Education
Excellence in Kentucky program as if the pupil was in actual attendance in
school.
(6) A pupil who does not participate in a moral instruction offering shall remain in
school during the time when the instruction is being given, and shall take noncredit
enrichment courses or participate in educational activities not required in the
regular curriculum, and that time shall be included as part of the actual school work
required in KRS 158.060. Students of different grade levels may be placed into
combined classrooms in accordance with maximum class size allotments as
described in KRS 157.360. These courses or activities shall be supervised by
certified school personnel and may include but are not limited to study hall,
computer instruction, music, art, library, physical education, and tutorial assistance.
(7) A school district shall not discriminate against a pupil for his or her participation or
Page 45 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 175
nonparticipation in a moral instruction offering.
(8) (a) Each local board of education shall submit the following information
quarterly to the Kentucky Department of Education:
1. The name of each applicant that submitted a request to provide a moral
instruction offering;
2. The date of the application;
3. The local board's approval or denial of the application; and
4. If the request was denied, the reason for the denial.
(b) The Kentucky Department of Education shall compile the quarterly reports
required by this subsection and submit a combined report to the Legislative
Research Commission no later than December 1 of each year for referral to
the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education.
Section 12. If a school district volunteer was prohibited from future school
volunteer opportunities pursuant to KRS 160.145(3)(c) prior to the effective date of this
Act, a school district may permit that person to participate in future school volunteer
opportunities.
Section 13. Section 2 of this Act may be cited as Erin's Law.
Section 14. Whereas it is critical to ensure that parents, schools, and school
districts have clarity on lawful electronic communication with students, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor
or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 46 of 46
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:47 AM Jacketed